Louisiana, session 2026, HB520.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5992(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5992. Truth and Transparency in the Louisiana Criminal Justice System Program;
creation, authority, and duties
* * *
B. For purposes of this program, each district clerk of court shall have has
the following duties and obligations:
(1)(a) Each district clerk of court responsible for maintaining criminal
records shall provide the public with electronic access to all minute entries as defined
in Subsection C of this Section, or summary thereof, involving any and all matters
in criminal court for any case filed on or after January 1, 2020, by transmission to
the online portal maintained by the Louisiana Clerks' Remote Access Authority
pursuant to R.S. 13:754. No other records or images, other than the minute entries
or summary thereof, are required to be transmitted in accordance with this Section.
The provisions of this Paragraph shall do not apply to traffic violations.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-767 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 520
(b) Each district clerk of court responsible for maintaining criminal records
shall provide officers of the court with electronic access to all minute entries as
defined in Subsection C of this Section, or summary thereof, involving any and all
matters in criminal court including but not limited to violent offenses and sexual
offenses for any case filed on or after January 1, 2027, by transmission to the online
portal maintained by the Louisiana Clerks' Remote Access Authority pursuant to
R.S. 13:754. No other records or images, other than the minute entries or summary
thereof, are required to be transmitted in accordance with this Section.
* * *